Washington statutes.
RCW 36.26.030

Selection committee.

The board of county commissioners of every county electing to become or to join in a public defender district shall appoint a selection committee for the purpose of selecting a full or part time public defender for the public defender district. Such selection committee shall consist of one member of each board of county commissioners, one member of the superior court from each county, and one practicing attorney from each county within the district.

[ 1969 c 94 s 3.]